test/src/morphology/N-aqbli_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aʼbli: # Noun 200 'eng /est abiline/fin' - full paradigm
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Nom: aʼbli
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Gen: aʼbliz
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Par: aʼblizt
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Dat: aʼblizõn
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Ins: aʼblizõks
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Ill: aʼblizõ
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Ela: aʼblizõst
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Nom: aʼblizt
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Gen: aʼblizt
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Par: aʼbliži
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Dat: aʼbliztõn
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Ins: aʼbliztõks
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Ill: aʼbližiz
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Ela: aʼbližist
